Alabama, session 2026rs, HB371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
The Judge of Probate of Pike County may exercise equity
jurisdiction concurrent with that of the circuit court in
cases originally filed in the Probate Court of Pike County if
the judge of probate is a licensed attorney in the State of
Alabama. In any case subject to this amendment, the judge of
probate shall possess the power and authority of a circuit
court judge trying the case, and the case shall be treated in
all respects in the same manner as a case filed in circuit
court. The Alabama Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply in the
cases except as otherwise specifically provided by law. This
amendment is self-executing, but the Legislature may enact
additional laws to implement this amendment if needed.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
Page 1

change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
HB371 Enrolled
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Pike County, proposing an amendment to the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to authorize the Judge of
Probate of Pike County to exercise equity jurisdiction
concurrent with that of the circuit court in cases originally
filed in the Probate Court of Pike County if the judge of
probate is a licensed attorney in the State of Alabama.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB371 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 24-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3